Illinois, session 104th, HB5464.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Freedom of Information Act is amended by 5changing Section 7 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 140/7)7    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 104-300)8    Sec. 7. Exemptions. 9    (1) When a request is made to inspect or copy a public 10record that contains information that is exempt from 11disclosure under this Section, but also contains information 12that is not exempt from disclosure, the public body may elect 13to redact the information that is exempt. The public body 14shall make the remaining information available for inspection 15and copying. Subject to this requirement, the following shall 16be exempt from inspection and copying: 17        (a) Information specifically prohibited from 18    disclosure by federal or State law or rules and 19    regulations implementing federal or State law. 20        (b) Private information, unless disclosure is required 21    by another provision of this Act, a State or federal law, 22    or a court order. 23        (b-5) Files, documents, and other data or databases   HB5464- 2 -LRB104 20734 HLH 34237 b1    maintained by one or more law enforcement agencies and 2    specifically designed to provide information to one or 3    more law enforcement agencies regarding the physical or 4    mental status of one or more individual subjects. 5        (c) Personal information contained within public 6    records, the disclosure of which would constitute a 7    clearly unwarranted invasion of personal privacy, unless 8    the disclosure is consented to in writing by the 9    individual subjects of the information. "Unwarranted 10    invasion of personal privacy" means the disclosure of 11    information that is highly personal or objectionable to a 12    reasonable person and in which the subject's right to 13    privacy outweighs any legitimate public interest in 14    obtaining the information. The disclosure of information 15    that bears on the public duties of public employees and 16    officials shall not be considered an invasion of personal 17    privacy. 18        (d) Records in the possession of any public body 19    created in the course of administrative enforcement 20    proceedings, and any law enforcement or correctional 21    agency for law enforcement purposes, but only to the 22    extent that disclosure would: 23            (i) interfere with pending or actually and 24        reasonably contemplated law enforcement proceedings 25        conducted by any law enforcement or correctional 26        agency that is the recipient of the request;   HB5464- 3 -LRB104 20734 HLH 34237 b1            (ii) interfere with active administrative 2        enforcement proceedings conducted by the public body 3        that is the recipient of the request; 4            (iii) create a substantial likelihood that a 5        person will be deprived of a fair trial or an impartial 6        hearing; 7            (iv) unavoidably disclose the identity of a 8        confidential source, confidential information 9        furnished only by the confidential source, or persons 10        who file complaints with or provide information to 11        administrative, investigative, law enforcement, or 12        penal agencies; except that the identities of 13        witnesses to traffic crashes, traffic crash reports, 14        and rescue reports shall be provided by agencies of 15        local government, except when disclosure would 16        interfere with an active criminal investigation 17        conducted by the agency that is the recipient of the 18        request; 19            (v) disclose unique or specialized investigative 20        techniques other than those generally used and known 21        or disclose internal documents of correctional 22        agencies related to detection, observation, or 23        investigation of incidents of crime or misconduct, and 24        disclosure would result in demonstrable harm to the 25        agency or public body that is the recipient of the 26        request;   HB5464- 4 -LRB104 20734 HLH 34237 b1            (vi) endanger the life or physical safety of law 2        enforcement personnel or any other person; or 3            (vii) obstruct an ongoing criminal investigation 4        by the agency that is the recipient of the request. 5        (d-5) A law enforcement record created for law 6    enforcement purposes and contained in a shared electronic 7    record management system if the law enforcement agency or 8    criminal justice agency that is the recipient of the 9    request did not create the record, did not participate in 10    or have a role in any of the events which are the subject 11    of the record, and only has access to the record through 12    the shared electronic record management system. As used in 13    this subsection (d-5), "criminal justice agency" means the 14    Illinois Criminal Justice Information Authority or the 15    Illinois Sentencing Policy Advisory Council.16        (d-6) Records contained in the Officer Professional 17    Conduct Database under Section 9.2 of the Illinois Police 18    Training Act, except to the extent authorized under that 19    Section. This includes the documents supplied to the 20    Illinois Law Enforcement Training Standards Board from the 21    Illinois State Police and Illinois State Police Merit 22    Board. 23        (d-7) Information gathered or records created from the 24    use of automatic license plate readers in connection with 25    Section 2-130 of the Illinois Vehicle Code. 26        (e) Records that relate to or affect the security of   HB5464- 5 -LRB104 20734 HLH 34237 b1    correctional institutions and detention facilities. 2        (e-5) Records requested by persons committed to the 3    Department of Corrections, Department of Human Services 4    Division of Mental Health, or a county jail if those 5    materials are available in the library of the correctional 6    institution or facility or jail where the inmate is 7    confined. 8        (e-6) Records requested by persons committed to the 9    Department of Corrections, Department of Human Services 10    Division of Mental Health, or a county jail if those 11    materials include records from staff members' personnel 12    files, staff rosters, or other staffing assignment 13    information. 14        (e-7) Records requested by persons committed to the 15    Department of Corrections or Department of Human Services 16    Division of Mental Health if those materials are available 17    through an administrative request to the Department of 18    Corrections or Department of Human Services Division of 19    Mental Health. 20        (e-8) Records requested by a person committed to the 21    Department of Corrections, Department of Human Services 22    Division of Mental Health, or a county jail, the 23    disclosure of which would result in the risk of harm to any 24    person or the risk of an escape from a jail or correctional 25    institution or facility.26        (e-9) Records requested by a person in a county jail   HB5464- 6 -LRB104 20734 HLH 34237 b1    or committed to the Department of Corrections or 2    Department of Human Services Division of Mental Health, 3    containing personal information pertaining to the person's 4    victim or the victim's family, including, but not limited 5    to, a victim's home address, home telephone number, work 6    or school address, work telephone number, social security 7    number, or any other identifying information, except as 8    may be relevant to a requester's current or potential case 9    or claim. 10        (e-10) Law enforcement records of other persons 11    requested by a person committed to the Department of 12    Corrections, Department of Human Services Division of 13    Mental Health, or a county jail, including, but not 14    limited to, arrest and booking records, mug shots, and 15    crime scene photographs, except as these records may be 16    relevant to the requester's current or potential case or 17    claim. 18        (f) Preliminary drafts, notes, recommendations, 19    memoranda, and other records in which opinions are 20    expressed, or policies or actions are formulated, except 21    that a specific record or relevant portion of a record 22    shall not be exempt when the record is publicly cited and 23    identified by the head of the public body. The exemption 24    provided in this paragraph (f) extends to all those 25    records of officers and agencies of the General Assembly 26    that pertain to the preparation of legislative documents.   HB5464- 7 -LRB104 20734 HLH 34237 b1        (g) Trade secrets and commercial or financial 2    information obtained from a person or business where the 3    trade secrets or commercial or financial information are 4    furnished under a claim that they are proprietary, 5    privileged, or confidential, and that disclosure of the 6    trade secrets or commercial or financial information would 7    cause competitive harm to the person or business, and only 8    insofar as the claim directly applies to the records 9    requested.10        The information included under this exemption includes 11    all trade secrets and commercial or financial information 12    obtained by a public body, including a public pension 13    fund, from a private equity fund or a privately held 14    company within the investment portfolio of a private 15    equity fund as a result of either investing or evaluating 16    a potential investment of public funds in a private equity 17    fund. The exemption contained in this item does not apply 18    to the aggregate financial performance information of a 19    private equity fund, nor to the identity of the fund's 20    managers or general partners. The exemption contained in 21    this item does not apply to the identity of a privately 22    held company within the investment portfolio of a private 23    equity fund, unless the disclosure of the identity of a 24    privately held company may cause competitive harm.25        Nothing contained in this paragraph (g) shall be 26    construed to prevent a person or business from consenting   HB5464- 8 -LRB104 20734 HLH 34237 b1    to disclosure. 2        (h) Proposals and bids for any contract, grant, or 3    agreement, including information which if it were 4    disclosed would frustrate procurement or give an advantage 5    to any person proposing to enter into a contractor 6    agreement with the body, until an award or final selection 7    is made. Information prepared by or for the body in 8    preparation of a bid solicitation shall be exempt until an 9    award or final selection is made. 10        (i) Valuable formulae, computer geographic systems, 11    designs, drawings, and research data obtained or produced 12    by any public body when disclosure could reasonably be 13    expected to produce private gain or public loss. The 14    exemption for "computer geographic systems" provided in 15    this paragraph (i) does not extend to requests made by 16    news media as defined in Section 2 of this Act when the 17    requested information is not otherwise exempt and the only 18    purpose of the request is to access and disseminate 19    information regarding the health, safety, welfare, or 20    legal rights of the general public. 21        (j) The following information pertaining to 22    educational matters:23            (i) test questions, scoring keys, and other 24        examination data used to administer an academic 25        examination; 26            (ii) information received by a primary or   HB5464- 9 -LRB104 20734 HLH 34237 b1        secondary school, college, or university under its 2        procedures for the evaluation of faculty members by 3        their academic peers; 4            (iii) information concerning a school or 5        university's adjudication of student disciplinary 6        cases, but only to the extent that disclosure would 7        unavoidably reveal the identity of the student; and8            (iv) course materials or research materials used 9        by faculty members. 10        (k) Architects' plans, engineers' technical 11    submissions, and other construction related technical 12    documents for projects not constructed or developed in 13    whole or in part with public funds and the same for 14    projects constructed or developed with public funds, 15    including, but not limited to, power generating and 16    distribution stations and other transmission and 17    distribution facilities, water treatment facilities, 18    airport facilities, sport stadiums, convention centers, 19    and all government owned, operated, or occupied buildings, 20    but only to the extent that disclosure would compromise 21    security. 22        (l) Minutes of meetings of public bodies closed to the 23    public as provided in the Open Meetings Act until the 24    public body makes the minutes available to the public 25    under Section 2.06 of the Open Meetings Act. 26        (m) Communications between a public body and an   HB5464- 10 -LRB104 20734 HLH 34237 b1    attorney or auditor representing the public body that 2    would not be subject to discovery in litigation, and 3    materials prepared or compiled by or for a public body in 4    anticipation of a criminal, civil, or administrative 5    proceeding upon the request of an attorney advising the 6    public body, and materials prepared or compiled with 7    respect to internal audits of public bodies. 8        (n) Records relating to a public body's adjudication 9    of employee grievances or disciplinary cases; however, 10    this exemption shall not extend to the final outcome of 11    cases in which discipline is imposed. 12        (o) Administrative or technical information associated 13    with automated data processing operations, including, but 14    not limited to, software, operating protocols, computer 15    program abstracts, file layouts, source listings, object 16    modules, load modules, user guides, documentation 17    pertaining to all logical and physical design of 18    computerized systems, employee manuals, and any other 19    information that, if disclosed, would jeopardize the 20    security of the system or its data or the security of 21    materials exempt under this Section. 22        (p) Records relating to collective negotiating matters 23    between public bodies and their employees or 24    representatives, except that any final contract or 25    agreement shall be subject to inspection and copying. 26        (q) Test questions, scoring keys, and other   HB5464- 11 -LRB104 20734 HLH 34237 b1    examination data used to determine the qualifications of 2    an applicant for a license or employment. 3        (r) The records, documents, and information relating 4    to real estate purchase negotiations until those 5    negotiations have been completed or otherwise terminated. 6    With regard to a parcel involved in a pending or actually 7    and reasonably contemplated eminent domain proceeding 8    under the Eminent Domain Act, records, documents, and 9    information relating to that parcel shall be exempt except 10    as may be allowed under discovery rules adopted by the 11    Illinois Supreme Court. The records, documents, and 12    information relating to a real estate sale shall be exempt 13    until a sale is consummated. 14        (s) Any and all proprietary information and records 15    related to the operation of an intergovernmental risk 16    management association or self-insurance pool or jointly 17    self-administered health and accident cooperative or pool. 18    Insurance or self-insurance (including any 19    intergovernmental risk management association or 20    self-insurance pool) claims, loss or risk management 21    information, records, data, advice, or communications. 22        (t) Information contained in or related to 23    examination, operating, or condition reports prepared by, 24    on behalf of, or for the use of a public body responsible 25    for the regulation or supervision of financial 26    institutions, insurance companies, or pharmacy benefit   HB5464- 12 -LRB104 20734 HLH 34237 b1    managers, unless disclosure is otherwise required by State 2    law. 3        (u) Information that would disclose or might lead to 4    the disclosure of secret or confidential information, 5    codes, algorithms, programs, or private keys intended to 6    be used to create electronic signatures under the Uniform 7    Electronic Transactions Act. 8        (v) Vulnerability assessments, security measures, and 9    response policies or plans that are designed to identify, 10    prevent, or respond to potential attacks upon a 11    community's population or systems, facilities, or 12    installations, but only to the extent that disclosure 13    could reasonably be expected to expose the vulnerability 14    or jeopardize the effectiveness of the measures, policies, 15    or plans, or the safety of the personnel who implement 16    them or the public. Information exempt under this item may 17    include such things as details pertaining to the 18    mobilization or deployment of personnel or equipment, to 19    the operation of communication systems or protocols, to 20    cybersecurity vulnerabilities, or to tactical operations. 21        (w) (Blank). 22        (x) Maps and other records regarding the location or 23    security of generation, transmission, distribution, 24    storage, gathering, treatment, or switching facilities 25    owned by a utility, by a power generator, or by the 26    Illinois Power Agency.   HB5464- 13 -LRB104 20734 HLH 34237 b1        (y) Information contained in or related to proposals, 2    bids, or negotiations related to electric power 3    procurement under Section 1-75 of the Illinois Power 4    Agency Act and Section 16-111.5 of the Public Utilities 5    Act that is determined to be confidential and proprietary 6    by the Illinois Power Agency or by the Illinois Commerce 7    Commission. 8        (z) Information about students exempted from 9    disclosure under Section 10-20.38 or 34-18.29 of the 10    School Code, and information about undergraduate students 11    enrolled at an institution of higher education exempted 12    from disclosure under Section 25 of the Illinois Credit 13    Card Marketing Act of 2009. 14        (aa) Information the disclosure of which is exempted 15    under the Viatical Settlements Act of 2009. 16        (bb) Records and information provided to a mortality 17    review team and records maintained by a mortality review 18    team appointed under the Department of Juvenile Justice 19    Mortality Review Team Act. 20        (cc) Information regarding interments, entombments, or 21    inurnments of human remains that are submitted to the 22    Cemetery Oversight Database under the Cemetery Care Act or 23    the Cemetery Oversight Act, whichever is applicable.24        (dd) Correspondence and records (i) that may not be 25    disclosed under Section 11-9 of the Illinois Public Aid 26    Code or (ii) that pertain to appeals under Section 11-8 of   HB5464- 14 -LRB104 20734 HLH 34237 b1    the Illinois Public Aid Code. 2        (ee) The names, addresses, or other personal 3    information of persons who are minors and are also 4    participants and registrants in programs of park 5    districts, forest preserve districts, conservation 6    districts, recreation agencies, and special recreation 7    associations.8        (ff) The names, addresses, or other personal 9    information of participants and registrants in programs of 10    park districts, forest preserve districts, conservation 11    districts, recreation agencies, and special recreation 12    associations where such programs are targeted primarily to 13    minors.14        (gg) Confidential information described in Section 15    1-100 of the Illinois Independent Tax Tribunal Act of 16    2012. 17        (hh) The report submitted to the State Board of 18    Education by the School Security and Standards Task Force 19    under item (8) of subsection (d) of Section 2-3.160 of the 20    School Code and any information contained in that report. 21        (ii) Records requested by persons committed to or 22    detained by the Department of Human Services under the 23    Sexually Violent Persons Commitment Act or committed to 24    the Department of Corrections under the Sexually Dangerous 25    Persons Act if those materials: (i) are available in the 26    library of the facility where the individual is confined;   HB5464- 15 -LRB104 20734 HLH 34237 b1    (ii) include records from staff members' personnel files, 2    staff rosters, or other staffing assignment information; 3    or (iii) are available through an administrative request 4    to the Department of Human Services or the Department of 5    Corrections.6        (jj) Confidential information described in Section 7    5-535 of the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. 8        (kk) The public body's credit card numbers, debit card 9    numbers, bank account numbers, Federal Employer 10    Identification Number, security code numbers, passwords, 11    and similar account information, the disclosure of which 12    could result in identity theft or impression or defrauding 13    of a governmental entity or a person. 14        (ll) Records concerning the work of the threat 15    assessment team of a school district, including, but not 16    limited to, any threat assessment procedure under the 17    School Safety Drill Act and any information contained in 18    the procedure.19        (mm) Information prohibited from being disclosed under 20    subsections (a) and (b) of Section 15 of the Student 21    Confidential Reporting Act. 22        (nn) Proprietary information submitted to the 23    Environmental Protection Agency under the Drug Take-Back 24    Act. 25        (oo) Records described in subsection (f) of Section 26    3-5-1 of the Unified Code of Corrections.   HB5464- 16 -LRB104 20734 HLH 34237 b1        (pp) Any and all information regarding burials, 2    interments, or entombments of human remains as required to 3    be reported to the Department of Natural Resources 4    pursuant either to the Archaeological and Paleontological 5    Resources Protection Act or the Human Remains Protection 6    Act.7        (qq) Reports described in subsection (e) of Section 8    16-15 of the Abortion Care Clinical Training Program Act. 9        (rr) Information obtained by a certified local health 10    department under the Access to Public Health Data Act. 11        (ss) For a request directed to a public body that is 12    also a HIPAA-covered entity, all information that is 13    protected health information, including demographic 14    information, that may be contained within or extracted 15    from any record held by the public body in compliance with 16    State and federal medical privacy laws and regulations, 17    including, but not limited to, the Health Insurance 18    Portability and Accountability Act and its regulations, 45 19    CFR Parts 160 and 164. As used in this paragraph, 20    "HIPAA-covered entity" has the meaning given to the term 21    "covered entity" in 45 CFR 160.103 and "protected health 22    information" has the meaning given to that term in 45 CFR 23    160.103. 24        (tt) Proposals or bids submitted by engineering 25    consultants in response to requests for proposal or other 26    competitive bidding requests by the Department of   HB5464- 17 -LRB104 20734 HLH 34237 b1    Transportation or the Illinois Toll Highway Authority. 2        (uu) Documents that, pursuant to the State of 3    Illinois' 1987 Agreement with the U.S. Nuclear Regulatory 4    Commission and the corresponding requirement to maintain 5    compatibility with the National Materials Program, have 6    been determined to be security sensitive. These documents 7    include information classified as safeguards, 8    safeguards-modified, and sensitive unclassified 9    nonsafeguards information, as identified in U.S. Nuclear 10    Regulatory Commission regulatory information summaries, 11    security advisories, and other applicable communications 12    or regulations related to the control and distribution of 13    security sensitive information. 14        (vv) Financial records and data related to real estate 15    income, expenses, and occupancy submitted by or on behalf 16    of a property owner to a chief county assessment officer, 17    except if submitted as part of an assessment appeal. 18    However, nothing in this paragraph (vv) prohibits a chief 19    county assessment officer from disclosing compiled and 20    anonymized data, and nothing in this paragraph (vv) shall 21    be construed to permit the chief county assessment officer 22    to withhold from public disclosure methodologies and 23    compiled and anonymized data used by any assessing 24    official in the valuation of property for assessment 25    purposes. 26    (1.5) Any information exempt from disclosure under the   HB5464- 18 -LRB104 20734 HLH 34237 b1Judicial Privacy Act shall be redacted from public records 2prior to disclosure under this Act. 3    (1.6) Any information exempt from disclosure under the 4Public Official Safety and Privacy Act shall be redacted from 5public records prior to disclosure under this Act.6    (1.7) Any information exempt from disclosure under 7paragraph (3.5) of Section 9-15 of the Election Code shall be 8redacted from public records prior to disclosure under this 9Act.10    (2) A public record that is not in the possession of a 11public body but is in the possession of a party with whom the 12agency has contracted to perform a governmental function on 13behalf of the public body, and that directly relates to the 14governmental function and is not otherwise exempt under this 15Act, shall be considered a public record of the public body, 16for purposes of this Act. 17    (3) This Section does not authorize withholding of 18information or limit the availability of records to the 19public, except as stated in this Section or otherwise provided 20in this Act. 21(Source: P.A. 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-423, eff. 1-1-24; 22103-446, eff. 8-4-23; 103-462, eff. 8-4-23; 103-540, eff. 231-1-24; 103-554, eff. 1-1-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-865, 24eff. 1-1-25; 104-438, eff. 1-1-26; 104-443, eff. 1-1-26; 25revised 1-7-26.)   HB5464- 19 -LRB104 20734 HLH 34237 b1    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 104-300)2    Sec. 7. Exemptions. 3    (1) When a request is made to inspect or copy a public 4record that contains information that is exempt from 5disclosure under this Section, but also contains information 6that is not exempt from disclosure, the public body may elect 7to redact the information that is exempt. The public body 8shall make the remaining information available for inspection 9and copying. Subject to this requirement, the following shall 10be exempt from inspection and copying: 11        (a) Records created or compiled by a State public 12    defender agency or commission subject to the State Public 13    Defender Act that contain: individual client identity; 14    individual case file information; individual investigation 15    records and other records that are otherwise subject to 16    attorney-client privilege; records that would not be 17    discoverable in litigation; records under Section 2.15; 18    training materials; records related to attorney 19    consultation and representation strategy; or any of the 20    above concerning clients of county public defenders or 21    other defender agencies and firms. This exclusion does not 22    apply to deidentified, aggregated, administrative records, 23    such as general case processing and workload information. 24        (a-5) Information specifically prohibited from 25    disclosure by federal or State law or rules and 26    regulations implementing federal or State law.   HB5464- 20 -LRB104 20734 HLH 34237 b1        (b) Private information, unless disclosure is required 2    by another provision of this Act, a State or federal law, 3    or a court order. 4        (b-5) Files, documents, and other data or databases 5    maintained by one or more law enforcement agencies and 6    specifically designed to provide information to one or 7    more law enforcement agencies regarding the physical or 8    mental status of one or more individual subjects. 9        (c) Personal information contained within public 10    records, the disclosure of which would constitute a 11    clearly unwarranted invasion of personal privacy, unless 12    the disclosure is consented to in writing by the 13    individual subjects of the information. "Unwarranted 14    invasion of personal privacy" means the disclosure of 15    information that is highly personal or objectionable to a 16    reasonable person and in which the subject's right to 17    privacy outweighs any legitimate public interest in 18    obtaining the information. The disclosure of information 19    that bears on the public duties of public employees and 20    officials shall not be considered an invasion of personal 21    privacy. 22        (d) Records in the possession of any public body 23    created in the course of administrative enforcement 24    proceedings, and any law enforcement or correctional 25    agency for law enforcement purposes, but only to the 26    extent that disclosure would:   HB5464- 21 -LRB104 20734 HLH 34237 b1            (i) interfere with pending or actually and 2        reasonably contemplated law enforcement proceedings 3        conducted by any law enforcement or correctional 4        agency that is the recipient of the request; 5            (ii) interfere with active administrative 6        enforcement proceedings conducted by the public body 7        that is the recipient of the request; 8            (iii) create a substantial likelihood that a 9        person will be deprived of a fair trial or an impartial 10        hearing; 11            (iv) unavoidably disclose the identity of a 12        confidential source, confidential information 13        furnished only by the confidential source, or persons 14        who file complaints with or provide information to 15        administrative, investigative, law enforcement, or 16        penal agencies; except that the identities of 17        witnesses to traffic crashes, traffic crash reports, 18        and rescue reports shall be provided by agencies of 19        local government, except when disclosure would 20        interfere with an active criminal investigation 21        conducted by the agency that is the recipient of the 22        request; 23            (v) disclose unique or specialized investigative 24        techniques other than those generally used and known 25        or disclose internal documents of correctional 26        agencies related to detection, observation, or   HB5464- 22 -LRB104 20734 HLH 34237 b1        investigation of incidents of crime or misconduct, and 2        disclosure would result in demonstrable harm to the 3        agency or public body that is the recipient of the 4        request; 5            (vi) endanger the life or physical safety of law 6        enforcement personnel or any other person; or 7            (vii) obstruct an ongoing criminal investigation 8        by the agency that is the recipient of the request. 9        (d-5) A law enforcement record created for law 10    enforcement purposes and contained in a shared electronic 11    record management system if the law enforcement agency or 12    criminal justice agency that is the recipient of the 13    request did not create the record, did not participate in 14    or have a role in any of the events which are the subject 15    of the record, and only has access to the record through 16    the shared electronic record management system. As used in 17    this subsection (d-5), "criminal justice agency" means the 18    Illinois Criminal Justice Information Authority or the 19    Illinois Sentencing Policy Advisory Council.20        (d-6) Records contained in the Officer Professional 21    Conduct Database under Section 9.2 of the Illinois Police 22    Training Act, except to the extent authorized under that 23    Section. This includes the documents supplied to the 24    Illinois Law Enforcement Training Standards Board from the 25    Illinois State Police and Illinois State Police Merit 26    Board.   HB5464- 23 -LRB104 20734 HLH 34237 b1        (d-7) Information gathered or records created from the 2    use of automatic license plate readers in connection with 3    Section 2-130 of the Illinois Vehicle Code. 4        (e) Records that relate to or affect the security of 5    correctional institutions and detention facilities. 6        (e-5) Records requested by persons committed to the 7    Department of Corrections, Department of Human Services 8    Division of Mental Health, or a county jail if those 9    materials are available in the library of the correctional 10    institution or facility or jail where the inmate is 11    confined. 12        (e-6) Records requested by persons committed to the 13    Department of Corrections, Department of Human Services 14    Division of Mental Health, or a county jail if those 15    materials include records from staff members' personnel 16    files, staff rosters, or other staffing assignment 17    information. 18        (e-7) Records requested by persons committed to the 19    Department of Corrections or Department of Human Services 20    Division of Mental Health if those materials are available 21    through an administrative request to the Department of 22    Corrections or Department of Human Services Division of 23    Mental Health. 24        (e-8) Records requested by a person committed to the 25    Department of Corrections, Department of Human Services 26    Division of Mental Health, or a county jail, the   HB5464- 24 -LRB104 20734 HLH 34237 b1    disclosure of which would result in the risk of harm to any 2    person or the risk of an escape from a jail or correctional 3    institution or facility.4        (e-9) Records requested by a person in a county jail 5    or committed to the Department of Corrections or 6    Department of Human Services Division of Mental Health, 7    containing personal information pertaining to the person's 8    victim or the victim's family, including, but not limited 9    to, a victim's home address, home telephone number, work 10    or school address, work telephone number, social security 11    number, or any other identifying information, except as 12    may be relevant to a requester's current or potential case 13    or claim. 14        (e-10) Law enforcement records of other persons 15    requested by a person committed to the Department of 16    Corrections, Department of Human Services Division of 17    Mental Health, or a county jail, including, but not 18    limited to, arrest and booking records, mug shots, and 19    crime scene photographs, except as these records may be 20    relevant to the requester's current or potential case or 21    claim. 22        (f) Preliminary drafts, notes, recommendations, 23    memoranda, and other records in which opinions are 24    expressed, or policies or actions are formulated, except 25    that a specific record or relevant portion of a record 26    shall not be exempt when the record is publicly cited and   HB5464- 25 -LRB104 20734 HLH 34237 b1    identified by the head of the public body. The exemption 2    provided in this paragraph (f) extends to all those 3    records of officers and agencies of the General Assembly 4    that pertain to the preparation of legislative documents. 5        (g) Trade secrets and commercial or financial 6    information obtained from a person or business where the 7    trade secrets or commercial or financial information are 8    furnished under a claim that they are proprietary, 9    privileged, or confidential, and that disclosure of the 10    trade secrets or commercial or financial information would 11    cause competitive harm to the person or business, and only 12    insofar as the claim directly applies to the records 13    requested.14        The information included under this exemption includes 15    all trade secrets and commercial or financial information 16    obtained by a public body, including a public pension 17    fund, from a private equity fund or a privately held 18    company within the investment portfolio of a private 19    equity fund as a result of either investing or evaluating 20    a potential investment of public funds in a private equity 21    fund. The exemption contained in this item does not apply 22    to the aggregate financial performance information of a 23    private equity fund, nor to the identity of the fund's 24    managers or general partners. The exemption contained in 25    this item does not apply to the identity of a privately 26    held company within the investment portfolio of a private   HB5464- 26 -LRB104 20734 HLH 34237 b1    equity fund, unless the disclosure of the identity of a 2    privately held company may cause competitive harm.3        Nothing contained in this paragraph (g) shall be 4    construed to prevent a person or business from consenting 5    to disclosure. 6        (h) Proposals and bids for any contract, grant, or 7    agreement, including information which if it were 8    disclosed would frustrate procurement or give an advantage 9    to any person proposing to enter into a contractor 10    agreement with the body, until an award or final selection 11    is made. Information prepared by or for the body in 12    preparation of a bid solicitation shall be exempt until an 13    award or final selection is made. 14        (i) Valuable formulae, computer geographic systems, 15    designs, drawings, and research data obtained or produced 16    by any public body when disclosure could reasonably be 17    expected to produce private gain or public loss. The 18    exemption for "computer geographic systems" provided in 19    this paragraph (i) does not extend to requests made by 20    news media as defined in Section 2 of this Act when the 21    requested information is not otherwise exempt and the only 22    purpose of the request is to access and disseminate 23    information regarding the health, safety, welfare, or 24    legal rights of the general public. 25        (j) The following information pertaining to 26    educational matters:  HB5464- 27 -LRB104 20734 HLH 34237 b1            (i) test questions, scoring keys, and other 2        examination data used to administer an academic 3        examination; 4            (ii) information received by a primary or 5        secondary school, college, or university under its 6        procedures for the evaluation of faculty members by 7        their academic peers; 8            (iii) information concerning a school or 9        university's adjudication of student disciplinary 10        cases, but only to the extent that disclosure would 11        unavoidably reveal the identity of the student; and12            (iv) course materials or research materials used 13        by faculty members. 14        (k) Architects' plans, engineers' technical 15    submissions, and other construction related technical 16    documents for projects not constructed or developed in 17    whole or in part with public funds and the same for 18    projects constructed or developed with public funds, 19    including, but not limited to, power generating and 20    distribution stations and other transmission and 21    distribution facilities, water treatment facilities, 22    airport facilities, sport stadiums, convention centers, 23    and all government owned, operated, or occupied buildings, 24    but only to the extent that disclosure would compromise 25    security. 26        (l) Minutes of meetings of public bodies closed to the   HB5464- 28 -LRB104 20734 HLH 34237 b1    public as provided in the Open Meetings Act until the 2    public body makes the minutes available to the public 3    under Section 2.06 of the Open Meetings Act. 4        (m) Communications between a public body and an 5    attorney or auditor representing the public body that 6    would not be subject to discovery in litigation, and 7    materials prepared or compiled by or for a public body in 8    anticipation of a criminal, civil, or administrative 9    proceeding upon the request of an attorney advising the 10    public body, and materials prepared or compiled with 11    respect to internal audits of public bodies. 12        (n) Records relating to a public body's adjudication 13    of employee grievances or disciplinary cases; however, 14    this exemption shall not extend to the final outcome of 15    cases in which discipline is imposed. 16        (o) Administrative or technical information associated 17    with automated data processing operations, including, but 18    not limited to, software, operating protocols, computer 19    program abstracts, file layouts, source listings, object 20    modules, load modules, user guides, documentation 21    pertaining to all logical and physical design of 22    computerized systems, employee manuals, and any other 23    information that, if disclosed, would jeopardize the 24    security of the system or its data or the security of 25    materials exempt under this Section. 26        (p) Records relating to collective negotiating matters   HB5464- 29 -LRB104 20734 HLH 34237 b1    between public bodies and their employees or 2    representatives, except that any final contract or 3    agreement shall be subject to inspection and copying. 4        (q) Test questions, scoring keys, and other 5    examination data used to determine the qualifications of 6    an applicant for a license or employment. 7        (r) The records, documents, and information relating 8    to real estate purchase negotiations until those 9    negotiations have been completed or otherwise terminated. 10    With regard to a parcel involved in a pending or actually 11    and reasonably contemplated eminent domain proceeding 12    under the Eminent Domain Act, records, documents, and 13    information relating to that parcel shall be exempt except 14    as may be allowed under discovery rules adopted by the 15    Illinois Supreme Court. The records, documents, and 16    information relating to a real estate sale shall be exempt 17    until a sale is consummated. 18        (s) Any and all proprietary information and records 19    related to the operation of an intergovernmental risk 20    management association or self-insurance pool or jointly 21    self-administered health and accident cooperative or pool. 22    Insurance or self-insurance (including any 23    intergovernmental risk management association or 24    self-insurance pool) claims, loss or risk management 25    information, records, data, advice, or communications. 26        (t) Information contained in or related to   HB5464- 30 -LRB104 20734 HLH 34237 b1    examination, operating, or condition reports prepared by, 2    on behalf of, or for the use of a public body responsible 3    for the regulation or supervision of financial 4    institutions, insurance companies, or pharmacy benefit 5    managers, unless disclosure is otherwise required by State 6    law. 7        (u) Information that would disclose or might lead to 8    the disclosure of secret or confidential information, 9    codes, algorithms, programs, or private keys intended to 10    be used to create electronic signatures under the Uniform 11    Electronic Transactions Act. 12        (v) Vulnerability assessments, security measures, and 13    response policies or plans that are designed to identify, 14    prevent, or respond to potential attacks upon a 15    community's population or systems, facilities, or 16    installations, but only to the extent that disclosure 17    could reasonably be expected to expose the vulnerability 18    or jeopardize the effectiveness of the measures, policies, 19    or plans, or the safety of the personnel who implement 20    them or the public. Information exempt under this item may 21    include such things as details pertaining to the 22    mobilization or deployment of personnel or equipment, to 23    the operation of communication systems or protocols, to 24    cybersecurity vulnerabilities, or to tactical operations. 25        (w) (Blank). 26        (x) Maps and other records regarding the location or   HB5464- 31 -LRB104 20734 HLH 34237 b1    security of generation, transmission, distribution, 2    storage, gathering, treatment, or switching facilities 3    owned by a utility, by a power generator, or by the 4    Illinois Power Agency. 5        (y) Information contained in or related to proposals, 6    bids, or negotiations related to electric power 7    procurement under Section 1-75 of the Illinois Power 8    Agency Act and Section 16-111.5 of the Public Utilities 9    Act that is determined to be confidential and proprietary 10    by the Illinois Power Agency or by the Illinois Commerce 11    Commission. 12        (z) Information about students exempted from 13    disclosure under Section 10-20.38 or 34-18.29 of the 14    School Code, and information about undergraduate students 15    enrolled at an institution of higher education exempted 16    from disclosure under Section 25 of the Illinois Credit 17    Card Marketing Act of 2009. 18        (aa) Information the disclosure of which is exempted 19    under the Viatical Settlements Act of 2009. 20        (bb) Records and information provided to a mortality 21    review team and records maintained by a mortality review 22    team appointed under the Department of Juvenile Justice 23    Mortality Review Team Act. 24        (cc) Information regarding interments, entombments, or 25    inurnments of human remains that are submitted to the 26    Cemetery Oversight Database under the Cemetery Care Act or   HB5464- 32 -LRB104 20734 HLH 34237 b1    the Cemetery Oversight Act, whichever is applicable.2        (dd) Correspondence and records (i) that may not be 3    disclosed under Section 11-9 of the Illinois Public Aid 4    Code or (ii) that pertain to appeals under Section 11-8 of 5    the Illinois Public Aid Code. 6        (ee) The names, addresses, or other personal 7    information of persons who are minors and are also 8    participants and registrants in programs of park 9    districts, forest preserve districts, conservation 10    districts, recreation agencies, and special recreation 11    associations.12        (ff) The names, addresses, or other personal 13    information of participants and registrants in programs of 14    park districts, forest preserve districts, conservation 15    districts, recreation agencies, and special recreation 16    associations where such programs are targeted primarily to 17    minors.18        (gg) Confidential information described in Section 19    1-100 of the Illinois Independent Tax Tribunal Act of 20    2012. 21        (hh) The report submitted to the State Board of 22    Education by the School Security and Standards Task Force 23    under item (8) of subsection (d) of Section 2-3.160 of the 24    School Code and any information contained in that report. 25        (ii) Records requested by persons committed to or 26    detained by the Department of Human Services under the   HB5464- 33 -LRB104 20734 HLH 34237 b1    Sexually Violent Persons Commitment Act or committed to 2    the Department of Corrections under the Sexually Dangerous 3    Persons Act if those materials: (i) are available in the 4    library of the facility where the individual is confined; 5    (ii) include records from staff members' personnel files, 6    staff rosters, or other staffing assignment information; 7    or (iii) are available through an administrative request 8    to the Department of Human Services or the Department of 9    Corrections.10        (jj) Confidential information described in Section 11    5-535 of the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. 12        (kk) The public body's credit card numbers, debit card 13    numbers, bank account numbers, Federal Employer 14    Identification Number, security code numbers, passwords, 15    and similar account information, the disclosure of which 16    could result in identity theft or impression or defrauding 17    of a governmental entity or a person. 18        (ll) Records concerning the work of the threat 19    assessment team of a school district, including, but not 20    limited to, any threat assessment procedure under the 21    School Safety Drill Act and any information contained in 22    the procedure.23        (mm) Information prohibited from being disclosed under 24    subsections (a) and (b) of Section 15 of the Student 25    Confidential Reporting Act. 26        (nn) Proprietary information submitted to the   HB5464- 34 -LRB104 20734 HLH 34237 b1    Environmental Protection Agency under the Drug Take-Back 2    Act. 3        (oo) Records described in subsection (f) of Section 4    3-5-1 of the Unified Code of Corrections. 5        (pp) Any and all information regarding burials, 6    interments, or entombments of human remains as required to 7    be reported to the Department of Natural Resources 8    pursuant either to the Archaeological and Paleontological 9    Resources Protection Act or the Human Remains Protection 10    Act.11        (qq) Reports described in subsection (e) of Section 12    16-15 of the Abortion Care Clinical Training Program Act. 13        (rr) Information obtained by a certified local health 14    department under the Access to Public Health Data Act. 15        (ss) For a request directed to a public body that is 16    also a HIPAA-covered entity, all information that is 17    protected health information, including demographic 18    information, that may be contained within or extracted 19    from any record held by the public body in compliance with 20    State and federal medical privacy laws and regulations, 21    including, but not limited to, the Health Insurance 22    Portability and Accountability Act and its regulations, 45 23    CFR Parts 160 and 164. As used in this paragraph, 24    "HIPAA-covered entity" has the meaning given to the term 25    "covered entity" in 45 CFR 160.103 and "protected health 26    information" has the meaning given to that term in 45 CFR   HB5464- 35 -LRB104 20734 HLH 34237 b1    160.103. 2        (tt) Proposals or bids submitted by engineering 3    consultants in response to requests for proposal or other 4    competitive bidding requests by the Department of 5    Transportation or the Illinois Toll Highway Authority. 6        (uu) Documents that, pursuant to the State of 7    Illinois' 1987 Agreement with the U.S. Nuclear Regulatory 8    Commission and the corresponding requirement to maintain 9    compatibility with the National Materials Program, have 10    been determined to be security sensitive. These documents 11    include information classified as safeguards, 12    safeguards-modified, and sensitive unclassified 13    nonsafeguards information, as identified in U.S. Nuclear 14    Regulatory Commission regulatory information summaries, 15    security advisories, and other applicable communications 16    or regulations related to the control and distribution of 17    security sensitive information. 18        (vv) Financial records and data related to real estate 19    income, expenses, and occupancy submitted by or on behalf 20    of a property owner to a chief county assessment officer, 21    except if submitted as part of an assessment appeal. 22    However, nothing in this paragraph (vv) prohibits a chief 23    county assessment officer from disclosing compiled and 24    anonymized data, and nothing in this paragraph (vv) shall 25    be construed to permit the chief county assessment officer 26    to withhold from public disclosure methodologies and   HB5464- 36 -LRB104 20734 HLH 34237 b1    compiled and anonymized data used by any assessing 2    official in the valuation of property for assessment 3    purposes. 4    (1.5) Any information exempt from disclosure under the 5Judicial Privacy Act shall be redacted from public records 6prior to disclosure under this Act. 7    (1.6) Any information exempt from disclosure under the 8Public Official Safety and Privacy Act shall be redacted from 9public records prior to disclosure under this Act.10    (1.7) Any information exempt from disclosure under 11paragraph (3.5) of Section 9-15 of the Election Code shall be 12redacted from public records prior to disclosure under this 13Act.14    (2) A public record that is not in the possession of a 15public body but is in the possession of a party with whom the 16agency has contracted to perform a governmental function on 17behalf of the public body, and that directly relates to the 18governmental function and is not otherwise exempt under this 19Act, shall be considered a public record of the public body, 20for purposes of this Act. 21    (3) This Section does not authorize withholding of 22information or limit the availability of records to the 23public, except as stated in this Section or otherwise provided 24in this Act. 25(Source: P.A. 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-423, eff. 1-1-24; 26103-446, eff. 8-4-23; 103-462, eff. 8-4-23; 103-540, eff.   HB5464- 37 -LRB104 20734 HLH 34237 b11-1-24; 103-554, eff. 1-1-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-865, 2eff. 1-1-25; 104-300, eff. 1-1-27; 104-438, eff. 1-1-26; 3104-443, eff. 1-1-26; revised 1-7-26.) 4    Section 10. The Property Tax Code is amended by adding 5Division 6 to Article 9 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 200/Art. 9 Div. 6 heading new)7Division 6. Physical Descriptions of Income-Producing Property 8    (35 ILCS 200/9-280 new)9    Sec. 9-280. Definitions. As used in this Division:10    "Income" means revenue generated by the real property and 11directed to or received by the property owner in the form of 12rent from unrelated persons or entities and ancillary revenue 13payable to the owner from unrelated persons or entities and 14generated exclusively from the operation of the real property. 15"Income" includes revenue from parking or other amenities 16provided to or for the benefit of the property's tenants. 17"Income" does not include revenue generated from personal 18property, including, but not limited to, revenue from a 19business enterprise that is operated on the real property or 20improvements made to the property by a tenant. 21    "Income-producing property" means property that is not 22owner-occupied property, as defined in this Section, and that 23is owned for the purpose of generating income from the   HB5464- 38 -LRB104 20734 HLH 34237 b1property itself, regardless of whether the property actually 2generates income in a particular year. "Income-producing 3property" does not include:4        (1) property with a market value of $500,000 or less 5    in the most recent assessment year for which an assessment 6    is certified;7        (2) residential property containing fewer than 7 8    residential units;9        (3) property assessed under Article 10 of this Code 10    and stadiums that are not qualified property under Section 11    10-215 that have a seating capacity of 20,000 or more and 12    host major professional sporting events;13        (4) property assessed by the Department under Article 14    11 of this Code;15        (5) property that is owned or leased by a hospital 16    licensed under the Hospital Licensing Act or operated 17    under the University of Illinois Hospital Act, including 18    any hospital affiliate that directly or indirectly 19    controls, is controlled by, or is under common control 20    with a hospital; and21        (6) property that is owned or leased by a facility 22    licensed under the Nursing Home Care Act that is an 23    intermediate or skilled facility. 24    "Owner-occupied property" means real property that is used 25or occupied by its owner or by a related person or entity as 26described in subsection (b) of Section 267 of the Internal   HB5464- 39 -LRB104 20734 HLH 34237 b1Revenue Code. 2    "Physical description" means the land size and information 3about the construction type, year built, total development 4size, number of buildings, number of stories in each building, 5and the capacity of structured parking garages, measured in 6the number of parking spaces. "Physical description" also 7includes the following: 8        (1) for residential property of 7 or more units:9            (A) whether any rented area is below grade;10            (B) the number of studio, 1-bedroom, 2-bedroom, 11        3-bedroom, and larger units;12            (C) whether or not the property offers tenants 13        access to a pool area;14            (D) whether or not the property offers tenants 15        access to an exercise area; and16            (E) whether any units in the building are enrolled 17        in any government-administered affordable housing 18        program. 19        (2) for office properties, a description of the net 20    rentable area of the property and a statement indicating 21    whether the owner represents to actual or prospective 22    tenants that the office space can accommodate x-ray or 23    magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) equipment or surgical 24    procedures; 25        (3) for retail properties, a description of the net 26    rentable area;   HB5464- 40 -LRB104 20734 HLH 34237 b1        (4) for industrial properties:2            (A) the size and location of any office area or 3        areas on the property;4            (B) the number of loading bay doors;5            (C) whether the clear ceiling height on the first 6        floor is at least 18 feet but less than 24 feet, at 7        least 24 feet but less than 30 feet, or at least 30 8        feet;9            (D) whether the property provides refrigerated 10        storage; and11            (E) if the property is a data center, whether the 12        total electrical capacity in the property is: (i) less 13        than 250 megawatts; (ii) at least 250 megawatts but 14        less than 500 megawatts; (iii) at least 500 megawatts 15        but less than one gigawatt; (iv) at least one gigawatt 16        but less than 5 gigawatts; or (v) 5 or more gigawatts; 17        and 18        (5) for hospitality properties, a statement indicating 19    whether the property has more than 10,000 square feet of 20    conference area and the room count. 21    "Property" has the meaning set forth in Section 1-130 of 22this Code and includes contiguous parcels or property index 23numbers that comprise one functional property location.  24    (35 ILCS 200/9-290 new)25    Sec. 9-290. Real property descriptions.  HB5464- 41 -LRB104 20734 HLH 34237 b1    (a) This Section applies to all counties in which the 2county board provides, by ordinance or resolution, that owners 3of income-producing properties must comply with this Section. 4Any ordinance or resolution providing that owners of 5income-producing properties must comply with this Section 6shall be adopted no later than December 31, 2029. 7    (b) In counties with 3,000,000 or more inhabitants, the 8provisions of this Section apply as follows: 9        (1) if the general assessment year for the property is 10    2028, this Section applies from the effective date of the 11    ordinance or resolution adopted by the county board under 12    subsection (a) until December 31, 2030; 13        (2) if the general assessment year for the property is 14    2029, this Section applies from the effective date of the 15    ordinance or resolution adopted by the county board under 16    subsection (a) until December 31, 2031; and 17        (3) if the general assessment year for the property is 18    2030, this Section applies from the effective date of the 19    ordinance or resolution adopted by the county board under 20    subsection (a) until December 31, 2032. 21    In counties with fewer than 3,000,000 inhabitants, the 22provisions of this Section apply on and after the effective 23date of the ordinance or resolution adopted by the county 24board under subsection (a) and until December 31 of the fourth 25year following the adoption of the ordinance or resolution. 26    (c) For the applicable period set forth in subsection (b),   HB5464- 42 -LRB104 20734 HLH 34237 b1owners of income-producing properties in the county shall file 2physical descriptions of their properties with the chief 3county assessment officer in the form and manner determined by 4the chief county assessment officer. Such a filing by the 5owner is required only after the chief county assessment 6officer notifies the owner of the property of the request for 7information. That notice shall include an individualized 8statement specifying all physical description information that 9the assessor's office has on record or recorded against the 10property and shall contain a statement that the owner may 11confirm the information if no changes are required. A filing 12by the owner that no changes are required is compliance with 13the request for information. The notice shall include 14description records or a link to an Internet resource of 15description records for that property. 16    (d) A request for information under subsection (c) may be 17issued with respect to a property only once during one general 18reassessment cycle for the property. A response to the request 19for information shall be submitted to the chief county 20assessment officer within 90 days after the chief county 21assessment officer mails the notice to the property owner 22under subsection (c). 23    (e) If, upon receiving a request for information under 24this Section, the owner of a property fails to submit the 25required physical description within 90 days after the chief 26county assessment officer mails the notice to the property   HB5464- 43 -LRB104 20734 HLH 34237 b1owner and fails to adequately explain why no submission is 2required, the owner shall pay a penalty to the chief county 3assessment officer as determined by the chief county 4assessment officer of up to 0.025% of the prior year's market 5value for the property at issue, as indicated by the most 6recent certified assessed value, but in no case shall the 7owner be required to pay more than a maximum penalty of $1,000 8per property. All penalties under this Section shall be 9deposited into the county's general fund or as otherwise 10allocated by the county board. The penalty under this Section 11shall be waived if, upon notice of failure to file and the 12imposition of the penalty, the owner provides the requested 13physical descriptions within 30 days after the postmark date 14of the notice of failure to file and the imposition of the 15penalty. An owner who responds to a request for information 16received under this Section with good faith efforts based on 17reasonable information and belief, or who, upon diligent 18investigation, is unable to provide specific requested 19information and provides an answer to this effect, shall be 20determined to be in substantial compliance with this Section 21and shall not be subject to a penalty. Responses to requests 22for information under this Section consistent with documents 23from the sale or transfer of the property to the current owner 24or with published advertisements made by the owner to current 25or prospective tenants, unless the owner has modified those 26particular aspects of the property since the sale, transfer,   HB5464- 44 -LRB104 20734 HLH 34237 b1lease, or lease proffer, shall be deemed to be made in good 2faith. The owner may explain the reasons for any 3inconsistencies and be deemed to have responded in good faith, 4and any inconsistencies related to documents from the sale or 5transfer of the property prepared by a prior owner shall not be 6attributable to the current owner. The chief county assessment 7officer shall review all submissions and determine whether the 8owner provided sufficient evidence that the owner was not 9required to report a property description or that the 10submission complies based on available documentation. 11    (f) If a party is dissatisfied with a decision of the chief 12county assessment officer, the party may request review of 13that decision. Upon such a request, at least 30 days' notice 14shall be provided to the party of a hearing to be conducted by 15a hearing officer designated by the chief county assessment 16officer. If a party is dissatisfied with a hearing officer's 17decision, the party may appeal that decision to the circuit 18court of the county in which the property is located as a final 19administrative decision under the Administrative Review Law. 20If a party is unsuccessful at hearing, the penalty imposed 21under this Section shall bear interest at 0.05% per month 22thereafter, beginning 21 days after the date of the decision 23or 21 days after the date of the issuance of a final decision 24on administrative review, as applicable.  25    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes   HB5464- 45 -LRB104 20734 HLH 34237 b1changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text 2that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section 3represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does 4not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes 5made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other 6Public Act. 7    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 8becoming law.